New York, session 2025-2026, S6225.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (iv) of paragraph (d) of subdivision 2, para- 2 graph (a) of subdivision 2-a, subparagraph (i) of paragraph (c) of 3 subdivision 3, subdivision 6 and paragraph (a) of subdivision 7 of 4 section 390 of the social services law, subparagraph (iv) of paragraph 5 (d) of subdivision 2 and subdivision 6 as added by chapter 750 of the 6 laws of 1990, paragraph (a) of subdivision 2-a as added and subparagraph 7 (i) of paragraph (c) of subdivision 3 as amended by chapter 416 of the 8 laws of 2000, and paragraph (a) of subdivision 7 as amended by chapter 9 160 of the laws of 2003, are amended to read as follows: 10 (iv) (A) Child day care providers who have been issued a license shall 11 openly display such license in the facility or home for which the 12 license is issued. Child day care providers who have registered with the 13 department shall provide proof of registration upon request. 14 (B) Home based child day care providers who have been issued a license 15 shall additionally openly display, in a method and format determined by 16 the office of children and family services, the number of household 17 members living in the home and update when there is any change in house- 18 hold. Child day care providers must disclose the most recently updated 19 information immediately upon request to an inspector, parent, legal 20 guardian, or relative within the third degree of consanguinity of the 21 parent of such child. 22 (a) The office of children and family services shall promulgate regu- 23 lations which establish minimum quality program requirements for 24 licensed and registered child day care homes, programs and facilities. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01434-02-5 S. 6225 2 1 Such requirements shall include but not be limited to (i) the need for 2 age appropriate activities, materials and equipment to promote cogni- 3 tive, educational, social, cultural, physical, emotional, language and 4 recreational development of children in care in a safe, healthy and 5 caring environment (ii) principles of childhood development (iii) appro- 6 priate staff/child ratios for family day care homes, group family day 7 care homes, school age day care programs and day care centers, provided 8 however that such staff/child ratios shall not be less stringent than 9 applicable staff/child ratios as set forth in part four hundred four- 10 teen, four hundred sixteen, four hundred seventeen or four hundred eigh- 11 teen of title eighteen of the New York code of rules and regulations as 12 of January first, two thousand (iv) appropriate levels of supervision of 13 children in care (v) minimum standards for sanitation, health, infection 14 control, nutrition, buildings and equipment, safety, security proce- 15 dures, first aid, fire prevention, fire safety, evacuation plans and 16 drills, prevention of child abuse and maltreatment, staff qualifications 17 and training, record keeping, and child behavior management (vi) educa- 18 tion on overdose prevention. 19 (i) The office of children and family services shall establish a toll- 20 free statewide telephone number and electronic mail to receive inquiries 21 about child day care homes, programs and facilities and complaints of 22 violations of the requirements of this section or regulations promulgat- 23 ed under this section. The office of children and family services shall 24 develop a system for investigation, which shall include inspection, of 25 such complaints. The office of children and family services may provide 26 for such investigations through purchase of services. The office of 27 children and family services shall develop a process for publicizing 28 such toll-free telephone number and electronic mail to the public for 29 making inquiries or complaints about child day care homes, programs or 30 facilities. A child day care provider shall be required to display such 31 toll free telephone number and electronic mail alongside their license 32 in a method and format determined by the office of children and family 33 services. 34 6. Unless otherwise limited by law, a parent with legal custody or a 35 legal guardian of any child in a child day care program shall have 36 unlimited and on demand access to such child or ward. Such parent or 37 guardian unless otherwise limited by law, also shall have the right to 38 inspect on demand during its hours of operation any area of a child day 39 care center, group family day care home, school-age child care program, 40 or family day care home to which the child or ward of such parent or 41 guardian has access or which could present a hazard to the health and 42 safety of the child or ward. Such right to inspect shall be posted 43 alongside the child day care provider's license in a method and format 44 determined by the office of children and family services. 45 (a) The department shall implement on a statewide basis programs to 46 educate parents and other potential consumers of child day care programs 47 about their selection and use. The department may provide for such 48 implementation through the purchase of services. Such education shall 49 include, but not be limited to, the following topics: 50 (i) types of child day care programs; 51 (ii) factors to be considered in selecting and evaluating child day 52 care programs; 53 (iii) regulations of the department governing the operation of differ- 54 ent types of programs; 55 (iv) rights of parents or guardians in relation to access to children 56 and inspection of child day care programs; S. 6225 3 1 (v) information concerning the availability of child day care subsi- 2 dies; 3 (vi) information about licensing and registration requirements; 4 (vii) prevention of child abuse and maltreatment in child day care 5 programs, including screening of child day care providers and employees; 6 (viii) tax information; [and] 7 (ix) factors to be considered in selecting and evaluating child day 8 care programs when a child needs administration of medications during 9 the time enrolled[.]; and 10 (x) all information required to be displayed or posted by a child day 11 care provider. 12 § 2. Section 390 of the social services law is amended by adding a 13 new subdivision 15 to read as follows: 14 15. All inspections of the premises of any child day care provider 15 pursuant to the provisions of this section shall include only a visual 16 inspection of every room and closet in the home or facility. 17 § 3. Section 390-a of the social services law is amended by adding a 18 new subdivision 6 to read as follows: 19 6. (a) All providers of child day care may provide and maintain onsite 20 opioid antagonists, as defined in section thirty-three hundred nine of 21 the public health law, in quantities and types deemed by the commission- 22 er of health. Such opioid antagonists shall be out of reach from chil- 23 dren and accessible by every operator, program director, employee and 24 assistant for use during emergencies to any individual on premises 25 suspected of having an opioid overdose whether or not there is a previ- 26 ous history of opioid abuse. 27 (b) The office of children and family services, in consultation with 28 the department of health and the office of addiction services and 29 supports, shall provide child day care providers and a parent, legal 30 guardian, or relative within the third degree of consanguinity of the 31 parent of such child, information on how to obtain overdose prevention 32 training and opioid antagonists. Such information shall only include 33 free opioid antagonists at no cost through existing programs or 34 services. 35 (c) Any person or entity acting reasonably and in good faith in 36 compliance with this subdivision shall not be subject to criminal, civil 37 or administrative liability solely by reason of such action. 38 § 4. Subparagraphs (ix) and (x) of paragraph (b) of subdivision 3 of 39 section 390-a of the social services law, subparagraph (ix) as amended 40 and subparagraph (x) as added by chapter 675 of the laws of 2019, are 41 amended and a new subparagraph (xi) is added to read as follows: 42 (ix) for operators, program directors, employees and assistants of 43 family day care homes, group family day care homes and child day care 44 centers, education and information on the identification, diagnosis and 45 prevention of shaken baby syndrome; [and] 46 (x) adverse childhood experiences (ACEs), focused on understanding 47 trauma and on nurturing resiliency[.]; and 48 (xi) overdose prevention training pursuant to a program approved under 49 section thirty-three hundred nine of the public health law. 50 § 5. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 51 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 52 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 53 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 54 on or before such effective date.